Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201871-1940
Deny, refuse renewal, or take disciplinary action against license; grounds.

The department may deny, refuse to renew, or take disciplinary action against a license issued under the Children's Residential Facilities and Placing Licensure Act on any of the following grounds:

(1) Failure to meet or violation of any of the requirements of the act or the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act;

(2) Violation of an order of the department under the act;

(3) Conviction, admission, or substantial evidence of committing or permitting, aiding, or abetting another to commit any unlawful act, including, but not limited to, unlawful acts committed by an applicant or licensee under the act, household members who reside at the place where children's residential care or child-placing services are provided, or employees of the applicant or licensee that involve:

(a) Physical abuse of children or vulnerable adults as defined in section 28-371;

(b) Endangerment or neglect of children or vulnerable adults;

(c) Sexual abuse, sexual assault, or sexual misconduct;

(d) Homicide;

(e) Use, possession, manufacturing, or distribution of a controlled substance listed in section 28-405;

(f) Property crimes, including, but not limited to, fraud, embezzlement, and theft by deception; or

(g) Use of a weapon in the commission of an unlawful act;

(4) Conduct or practices detrimental to the health, safety, or welfare of any individual residing in, served by, or employed at the residential child-caring agency or child-placing agency;

(5) Failure to allow an agent or employee of the department access to the residential child-caring agency or child-placing agency for the purposes of inspection, investigation, or other information collection activities necessary to carry out the duties of the department;

(6) Failure to allow local or state inspectors, investigators, or law enforcement officers access to the residential child-caring agency or child-placing agency for the purposes of investigation necessary to carry out their duties;

(7) Failure to meet requirements relating to sanitation, fire safety, and building codes;

(8) Failure to comply with or violation of the Medication Aide Act;

(9) Failure to file a report of suspected abuse or neglect as required by sections 28-372 and 28-711;

(10) Violation of any city, village, or county rules, regulations, resolutions, or ordinances regulating licensees;

(11) A history of misconduct or violations by an applicant or licensee involving children or vulnerable adults;

(12) Violation of the requirements of section 83-4,134.01; or

(13) Violation of any federal, state, or local law involving care of children.

Laws 2013, LB265, § 17;

Laws 2018, LB670, § 15.
July 19, 2018
Medication Aide Act, see section 71-6718.